North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-08 Control of Gas and Oil Resources
38-08-25.
Hydraulic fracturing — Use of carbon dioxide — Designated as acceptable recovery processes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative assembly designates hydraulic fracturing, a mechanical method of increasing the permeability of rock to increase the amount of oil and gas produced from the rock; and the use of carbon dioxide for enhanced recovery of oil, gas, and other minerals acceptable recovery processes in this state.

It is in the public interest to promote the use of carbon dioxide to benefit the state, to help ensure the viability of the state’s coal and power industries, and to benefit the state economy. Carbon dioxide is a potentially valuable commodity, and increasing its availability is important for commercial, industrial, or other uses, including enhanced recovery of oil, gas, and other minerals.

It is in the public interest to encourage and authorize cycling, recycling, pressure maintenance, secondary recovery operations, and enhanced recovery operations utilizing carbon dioxide for the greatest possible economic recovery of oil and gas.

It is in the public interest for a person conducting operations authorized by the commission under this chapter to use as much of a subsurface geologic formation as reasonably necessary to allow for unit operations for enhanced oil recovery, utilization of carbon dioxide for enhanced recovery of oil, gas, and other minerals, disposal operations, or any other operation authorized by this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person conducting unit operations for enhanced oil recovery, utilization of carbon dioxide for enhanced recovery of oil, gas, and other minerals, disposal operations, or any other operation authorized by the commission under this chapter may utilize subsurface geologic formations in the state for such operations or any other permissible purpose under this chapter. Any other provision of law may not be construed to entitle the owner of a subsurface geologic formation to prohibit or demand payment for the use of the subsurface geologic formation for unit operations for enhanced oil recovery, utilization of carbon dioxide for enhanced recovery of oil, gas, and other minerals, disposal operations, or any other operation conducted under this chapter. As used in this section, “subsurface geologic formation” means any cavity or void, whether natural or artificially created, in a subsurface sedimentary stratum.

The commission may adopt and enforce rules and orders to effectuate the purposes of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 264, § 1; 2019, ch. 300, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Introduction: Avoiding Dutch Disease and Bad Policy Choices, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 475 (2011).

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: North Dakota Expertise: A Chance To Lead in Economically and Environmentally Sustainable Hydraulic Fracturing, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 485 (2011).

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Water Resources and Oil and Gas Development: A Survey of North Dakota Law, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 507 (2011).

38-08-26.
Submission of geographic information system data on oil and gas underground gathering pipelines required.

The commission shall create a geographic information system database for collecting pipeline shape files as submitted by each underground gathering pipeline owner or operator. The shape files and the resulting geographic information system database are exempt from any disclosure to parties outside the commission and are confidential except as provided in this section. The information may be used by the commission in furtherance of the commission’s duties.

An owner or operator of an underground gathering pipeline shall submit to the commission, in a time period no longer than one hundred eighty days of putting any underground gathering pipeline into service, a shape file showing the centerline of the pipeline. Upon abandonment of any underground gathering pipeline, the owner or operator shall submit, in a time period no longer than one hundred eighty days of abandonment, to the commission an updated shape file reflecting the pipeline or portion of a pipeline that has been abandoned. For an oil and gas underground gathering pipeline that is in service after August 1, 2011, and before August 1, 2013, the owner or operator or most recent owner or operator shall submit, within eighteen months from August 1, 2013, shape files for all existing underground gathering pipelines, including any known abandoned pipeline.

Upon a written request by the owner or tenant of the real property regarding underground gathering pipelines located within the bounds of the real property owned or leased by that property owner or tenant, the commission shall provide to the owner or tenant the requested information. The commission may not include information, if available, on any underground gathering pipeline that exists outside the bounds of the real property owned or leased by the requesting party.

Upon request by the tax commissioner, the commission may allow access to information contained in the geographic information system database to the tax commissioner to be used for the sole purpose of administering the valuation and assessment of centrally assessed underground gathering pipeline property under chapter 57-06. The information obtained under this subsection is confidential and may be used only for the purposes identified in this subsection.

The surface owner may share information contained in the geographic information system database.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 277, § 8; 2015, ch. 254, § 7, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

38-08-27.
Controls, inspections, and engineering design on crude oil and produced water underground gathering pipelines.

The application of this section is limited to an underground gathering pipeline that is designed or intended to transfer crude oil or produced water from a production facility for disposal, storage, or sale purposes and which was placed into service after August 1, 2015. Upon request, the operator shall provide the commission the underground gathering pipeline engineering construction design drawings and specifications, list of independent inspectors, and a plan for leak protection and monitoring for the underground gathering pipeline. Within sixty days of an underground gathering pipeline being placed into service, the operator of that pipeline shall file with the commission an independent inspector’s certificate of hydrostatic or pneumatic testing of the underground gathering pipeline.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 2, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015.